Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. Medical Inspection Generally; Health Services

§§ 1381-1384.
Repealed. 2011, No. 129 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 11, 2012.

§ 1385.
Repealed. 2011, No. 75 (Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. March 7, 2012.

§ 1386.
Health services for children.

In any school year, a school board may expend from its funds a sum not to exceed three percent of that year’s school budget for any necessary health service for a student whose parents are unable to pay for it. Expenditures for this purpose may include the purchase of eyeglasses and the provision of dental and other health services approved by the school nurse. The right to determine who is covered under this section shall be in the discretion of the school board.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 56

, § 10, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1387.
Possession and self-administration of emergency medication.

Pursuant to the requirements of this section, each public and approved independent school in the State shall permit students with life-threatening allergies or with asthma to possess and self-administer emergency medication at school, on school grounds, at school-sponsored activities, on school-provided transportation, and during school-related programs.

In each school year for which possession and self-administration of emergency medication is requested, the student’s parent or guardian shall provide the school with:

written authorization, on a form to be provided by the school, for the student to possess and self-administer emergency medication;

written documentation from the student’s physician:

stating that the student has one or more life-threatening allergies or asthma, or both;

providing the name of the emergency medication, the dosage, and the times and circumstances under which the medication is to be taken;

affirming that the student:

is capable of, and has been instructed by the physician in, the proper method of self-administration of the emergency medication;

has been advised of possible side-effects of the medication;

has been informed of when and how to access emergency services.

In each school year for which possession and self-administration of emergency medication is requested, the student’s parent or guardian shall develop, in consultation with the school nurse or the designated health care staff at an approved independent school, a plan of action regarding responding to the student’s life-threatening allergy or allergies or asthma. The plan of action shall be based upon the written documentation provided by the student’s physician and shall include the name of each emergency medication, the dosage, and the times and circumstances under which the medication is to be taken. The written plan shall prominently state that the medication is solely for the use of the student covered by the plan. The parties developing the plan of action shall determine both to whom the plan, or notification of the plan, shall be given and the person or persons responsible for distribution or notification. The plan may include a requirement that the student notify a school employee or agent after self-administering emergency medication. The written plan shall become part of the student’s health records maintained by the school.

The student’s parent or guardian shall sign a statement on a form to be provided by the school releasing the school and its employees and agents, including volunteers, from liability as a result of any injury arising from the student’s self-administration of the emergency medication, except when the conduct of the school, school employee, or agent would constitute gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a public school district or an approved independent school from adopting school policies and individual plans of action regarding the possession and self-administration of emergency medication for medical conditions other than asthma and life-threatening allergies.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1388.
Stock supply and emergency administration of epinephrine auto-injectors.

As used in this section:

“Designated personnel” means a school employee, agent, or volunteer who has been authorized by the school administrator to provide and administer epinephrine auto-injectors under this section and who has completed the training required by State Board policy.

“Epinephrine auto-injector” means a single-use device that delivers a premeasured dose of epinephrine.

“Health care professional” means a physician licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed to prescribe drugs and medical devices pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, or a physician assistant licensed to prescribe drugs and medical devices pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 31.

“School” means a public or approved independent school and extends to school grounds, school-sponsored activities, school-provided transportation, and school-related programs.

“School administrator” means a school’s principal or headmaster.

A health care professional may prescribe an epinephrine auto-injector in a school’s name, which may be maintained by the school for use as described in subsection (d) of this section. The health care professional shall issue to the school a standing order for the use of an epinephrine auto-injector prescribed under this section, including protocols for:
(b) (1) A health care professional may prescribe an epinephrine auto-injector in a school’s name, which may be maintained by the school for use as described in subsection (d) of this section. The health care professional shall issue to the school a standing order for the use of an epinephrine auto-injector prescribed under this section, including protocols for:

assessing whether an individual is experiencing a potentially life-threatening allergic reaction;

administering an epinephrine auto-injector to an individual experiencing a potentially life-threatening allergic reaction;

caring for an individual after administering an epinephrine auto-injector to him or her, including contacting emergency services personnel and documenting the incident; and

disposing of used or expired epinephrine auto-injectors.

A pharmacist licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 36 or a health care professional may dispense epinephrine auto-injectors prescribed to a school.

A school may maintain a stock supply of epinephrine auto-injectors. A school may enter into arrangements with epinephrine auto-injector manufacturers or suppliers to acquire epinephrine auto-injectors for free or at reduced or fair market prices.

The school administrator may authorize a school nurse or designated personnel, or both, to:

provide an epinephrine auto-injector to a student for self-administration according to a plan of action for managing the student’s life-threatening allergy maintained in the student’s school health records pursuant to section 1387 of this title;

administer a prescribed epinephrine auto-injector to a student according to a plan of action maintained in the student’s school health records; and

administer an epinephrine auto-injector, in accordance with the protocol issued under subsection (b) of this section, to a student or other individual at a school if the nurse or designated personnel believe in good faith that the student or individual is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the student or individual has a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector.

Designated personnel, a school, and a health care professional prescribing an epinephrine auto-injector to a school shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability arising from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine auto-injector under this section, unless the person’s conduct constituted intentional misconduct. Providing or administering an epinephrine auto-injector under this section does not constitute the practice of medicine.

On or before January 1, 2014, the State Board, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt policies for managing students with life-threatening allergies and other individuals with life-threatening allergies who may be present at a school. The policies shall:

establish protocols to prevent exposure to allergens in schools;

establish procedures for responding to life-threatening allergic reactions in schools, including postemergency procedures;

implement a process for schools and the parents or guardians of students with a life-threatening allergy to jointly develop a written individualized allergy management plan of action that:

incorporates instructions from a student’s physician regarding the student’s life-threatening allergy and prescribed treatment;

includes the requirements of section 1387 of this title, if a student is authorized to possess and self-administer emergency medication at school;

becomes part of the student’s health records maintained by the school; and

is updated each school year;

require education and training for school nurses and designated personnel, including training related to storing and administering an epinephrine auto-injector and recognizing and responding to a life-threatening allergic reaction; and

require each school to make publicly available protocols and procedures developed in accordance with the policies adopted by the State Board under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 68

, § 4.